Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-702
State officers; biennial reports to
Clerk of the Legislature.

Each member of the Legislature shall
receive an electronic copy of a biennial report required to be submitted by a state officer to the Clerk
of the Legislature by making a request for it to the state officer
responsible for the report.

Laws 1881, c. 80, § 3, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 5585;

Laws 1915, c. 100, § 1, p. 243;

C.S.1922, § 4892;

C.S.1929, § 84-702;

R.S.1943, § 84-702;

Laws 1947, c. 344, § 6, p. 1088;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 23, p. 729;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 73;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 49;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 226.